src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON LASSAT-plc ! Place names
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              LASSATDECL      ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON LASSATDECL
   LASSAT-OBL ;

LEXICON LASSAT-OBL
             +Ess:X4in    K     ;
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8      RHyph ;
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4      RHyph ;
          +Pl+Nom:Y5t     K     ;
          +Pl+Gen:Y5jd    K     ;
        +CmpN/PlG:jd      RHyph ;
          +Pl+Acc:Y5jd    K     ;
          +Pl+Ill:Y5jde   K     ;
          +Pl+Loc:Y5jn    K     ;
          +Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K     ;


LEXICON ADJAGAT-plc ! Place names
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              ADJAGATDECL     ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
           @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell:X4@U.Cap.Opt@   VUONAT          ;


LEXICON ADJAGATDECL
   ADJAGAT-OBL ;

LEXICON ADJAGAT-OBL
              +Ess:X4n      K     ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8       RHyph ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4       RHyph ;
           +Pl+Nom:X2at     K     ;
           +Pl+Gen:X2ijd    K     ;
         +CmpN/PlG:X2ijd    RHyph ;
           +Pl+Acc:X2ijd    K     ;
           +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda  K     ;
           +Pl+Loc:X2ijn    K     ;
           +Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K     ;

LEXICON ANGELIT-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ANGELITDECL ;

LEXICON ANGELITDECL
 +Pl+Nom:t     K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda  K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Pl+Gen:jd    K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd    K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn    K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON SKANIK-plc !plurals on -k
                   @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@   SKANIK-UCASE    ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT          ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>k@U.Cap.Opt@  DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON SKANIK-org !plurals on -k
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKANIK-UCASE ;



LEXICON SKANIK-UCASE
    +Ess:n   K            ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4k K            ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4k K            ; ! The Muosát suohkanstivra fix (Gen in -t for Pl names)
 +Pl+Ill:jde K            ; ! 2-syll stem
     +Pl:X5  ALEUHTAT-OBL ;


LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-org !vow+a
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL ;


LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL
           +Sg+Nom:a%>      K     ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:a%>X7    RHyph ; !
           +Sg+Gen:a%>      K     ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a%>X7    RHyph ; !
           +Sg+Acc:a%>      K     ;
           +Sg+Ill:i%>j     K     ;
           +Sg+Loc:a%>s     K     ;
           +Sg+Com:a%>jn    K     ;
              +Ess:a%>n     K     ;
           +Pl+Nom:a%>t     K     ;
           +Pl+Gen:a%>jd    K     ;
 +CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:a%>jd    RHyph ; !
           +Pl+Acc:a%>jd    K     ;
           +Pl+Ill:a%>jde   K     ;
           +Pl+Loc:a%>jn    K     ;
           +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K     ;


LEXICON RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-org !vow+a
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-OBL ;

LEXICON RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-OBL
              +Ess:a%>n     K     ;
           +Pl+Nom:a%>t     K     ;
           +Pl+Gen:a%>jd    K     ;
 +CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:a%>jd    RHyph ; !
           +Pl+Acc:a%>jd    K     ;
           +Pl+Ill:a%>jde   K     ;
           +Pl+Loc:a%>jn    K     ;
           +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K     ;

! ========================== !
! Common continuation lexica !
! ========================== !


! Lexica making laš-adjectives out of names.

LEXICON PLACELASH
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž   ATTR      ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž   JOHTOLAT0 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža  PxV       ; ! tentative.
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan K         ;
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan PxC       ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža  LASJOBL   ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


LEXICON NENPLACELASH
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažž   ATTR      ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažž   JOHTOLAT0 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža     PxV       ; ! tentative.
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan    K         ;
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan    PxC       ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažža  PxV       ; ! tentative.
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažžan K         ;
    @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažžan PxC       ; ! tentative, check.
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažža  LASJOBL   ;


LEXICON PIPPI-obj
   ACCRA-obj ;

LEXICON PIPPI-malfem
   ACCRA-malfem ;

LEXICON PIPPI-femsur
   ACCRA-femsur ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRA-DC       ;
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I        ;
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL      ;
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_IICASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #              ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ERVASTI_IICASE
 +Pl+Gen:jd9   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9   K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda  K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn    K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            ACCRA-DC          ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I           ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_IICASE    ;
                :%>            PLACELASH         ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-fem
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>             ACCRA-DC       ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-I        ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-OBL      ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ERVASTI_IICASE ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #              ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL  ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ERVASTI-mal
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>             ACCRA-DC       ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-I        ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-OBL      ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ERVASTI_IICASE ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  #              ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL  ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ERVASTI-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>            ACCRA-DC          ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I           ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_IICASE    ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>            ACCRA-DC       ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I        ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL      ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_IICASE ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-ani
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>             ACCRA-DC       ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-I        ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ACCRA-OBL      ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  ERVASTI_IICASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL  ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ERVASTI-LOAN-plc
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I           ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE      ;
                           +Use/Sub:%>            PLACELASH         ; !
