src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Angelit:Angeli ANGELIT-org ;
Baikalágojávrrik:Baika^lágo^jávrri SKANIK-plc ;
Bievák:Bievá SKANIK-plc ;
Divrrák:Divrrá SKANIK-plc ;
Eksekutivkomitea:Eksekutiv^komite ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Eksekutivkomitéa:Eksekutiv^komité ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Feaskkerádjagat:Feaskker^ád'jag8 ADJAGAT-plc ;
Geatkelágojávrrik:Geatke^lágo^jávrri SKANIK-plc ;
Grenselandsmusea:Grense^lands^muse ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Grenselandsmuséa:Grense^lands^musé ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Silbamusea:Silba^muse ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Silbamuséa:Silba^musé ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Ivvárstádik:Ivvár^stádi SKANIK-plc ;
Juohkoaiádjagat:Juohk^oai^ád'jag8 ADJAGAT-plc ; !FIN
Márkománák:Márko^máná SKANIK-org ;
Njárgalássát:Njárga^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
Reahpenlássát:Reahpen^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
RiddoDuottarMuseat:RiddoDuottarMuse RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-org ;
Saviomusea:Savio^muse ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Saviomuséa:Savio^musé ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Skoahppaádjagat:Skoahppa^ád'jag8 ADJAGAT-plc ; !FIN
Skálonjuokčamat:Skálo^njuok'čam8 ADJAGAT-plc ; !FIN
Skánik:Skáni SKANIK-plc ;
Skárfalássát:Skárfa^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
Sámegiel% Berošteaddjik:Sámegiel% Berošteaddji¤ SKANIK-org ;
Sámekomitea:Sáme^komite ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Sámekomitéa:Sáme^komité ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Sámenuorak:Sáme^nuora SKANIK-org ;
Sávalássát:Sáva^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
Veajetádjagat:Veajet^ád'jag8 ADJAGAT-plc ; !FIN
Álbmotmusea:Álbmot^muse ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Álbmotmuséa:Álbmot^musé ALBMOTMUSEA-org ;
Čoahkenlássát:Čoahken^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
Čáhppeslássát:Čáhppes^lássis LASSAT-plc ;
